Washington statutes.
RCW 43.360.050

Washington main street trust fund account.

The Washington main street trust fund account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from private contributions, federal funds, legislative appropriations, and fees for services, if levied, must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the operation of the Washington main street program.

[ 2005 c 514 s 912.]

NOTES:

Short title—2005 c 514 ss 901-912: See note following RCW 43.360.005.

Effective date—2005 c 514: See note following RCW 83.100.230.

Part headings not law—Severability—2005 c 514: See notes following RCW 82.12.808.